Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2262.03
Court; order of intensive supervision probation; when; laws applicable.

(1) Whenever the court considers the sentence for an offender convicted of any crime for which a term of imprisonment of six months or more is possible and mandatory minimum imprisonment is not specifically required, the court may withhold the sentence of imprisonment and sentence the offender to intensive supervision probation. The decision whether to sentence an offender to intensive supervision probation shall be guided by the criteria for withholding a sentence of imprisonment as set forth in subsection (2) of this section and subsections (2) and (3) of section 29-2260.

(2) Intensive supervision probation shall be governed by the laws governing probation except as required by specific provisions of this section and sections 29-2252.01, 29-2262.02, 29-2262.04, and 29-2262.05.

Laws 1990, LB 220, § 7.